Illinois, session 104th, HB3776.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 207 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/207)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-207)7    Sec. 207. Net Losses. 8    (a) If after applying all of the (i) modifications 9provided for in paragraph (2) of Section 203(b), paragraph (2) 10of Section 203(c) and paragraph (2) of Section 203(d) and (ii) 11the allocation and apportionment provisions of Article 3 of 12this Act and subsection (c) of this Section, the taxpayer's 13net income results in a loss;14        (1) for any taxable year ending prior to December 31, 15    1999, such loss shall be allowed as a carryover or 16    carryback deduction in the manner allowed under Section 17    172 of the Internal Revenue Code;18        (2) for any taxable year ending on or after December 19    31, 1999 and prior to December 31, 2003, such loss shall be 20    allowed as a carryback to each of the 2 taxable years 21    preceding the taxable year of such loss and shall be a net 22    operating loss carryover to each of the 20 taxable years 23    following the taxable year of such loss;  HB3776- 2 -LRB104 10003 HLH 20073 b1        (3) for any taxable year ending on or after December 2    31, 2003 and prior to December 31, 2021, such loss shall be 3    allowed as a net operating loss carryover to each of the 12 4    taxable years following the taxable year of such loss, 5    except as provided in subsection (d); and6        (4) for any taxable year ending on or after December 7    31, 2021, and for any net loss incurred in a taxable year 8    prior to a taxable year ending on or after December 31, 9    2021 for which the statute of limitation for utilization 10    of such net loss has not expired, such loss shall be 11    allowed as a net operating loss carryover to each of the 20 12    taxable years following the taxable year of such loss, 13    except as provided in subsection (d). 14    (a-5) Election to relinquish carryback and order of 15application of losses.16            (A) For losses incurred in tax years ending prior 17        to December 31, 2003, the taxpayer may elect to 18        relinquish the entire carryback period with respect to 19        such loss. Such election shall be made in the form and 20        manner prescribed by the Department and shall be made 21        by the due date (including extensions of time) for 22        filing the taxpayer's return for the taxable year in 23        which such loss is incurred, and such election, once 24        made, shall be irrevocable.25            (B) The entire amount of such loss shall be 26        carried to the earliest taxable year to which such   HB3776- 3 -LRB104 10003 HLH 20073 b1        loss may be carried. The amount of such loss which 2        shall be carried to each of the other taxable years 3        shall be the excess, if any, of the amount of such loss 4        over the sum of the deductions for carryback or 5        carryover of such loss allowable for each of the prior 6        taxable years to which such loss may be carried.7    (b) Any loss determined under subsection (a) of this 8Section must be carried back or carried forward in the same 9manner for purposes of subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 10of this Act as for purposes of subsections (c) and (d) of 11Section 201 of this Act.12    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, for 13each taxable year ending on or after December 31, 2008, for 14purposes of computing the loss for the taxable year under 15subsection (a) of this Section and the deduction taken into 16account for the taxable year for a net operating loss 17carryover under paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (a) 18of this Section, the loss and net operating loss carryover 19shall be reduced in an amount equal to the reduction to the net 20operating loss and net operating loss carryover to the taxable 21year, respectively, required under Section 108(b)(2)(A) of the 22Internal Revenue Code, multiplied by a fraction, the numerator 23of which is the amount of discharge of indebtedness income 24that is excluded from gross income for the taxable year (but 25only if the taxable year ends on or after December 31, 2008) 26under Section 108(a) of the Internal Revenue Code and that   HB3776- 4 -LRB104 10003 HLH 20073 b1would have been allocated and apportioned to this State under 2Article 3 of this Act but for that exclusion, and the 3denominator of which is the total amount of discharge of 4indebtedness income excluded from gross income under Section 5108(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for the taxable year. The 6reduction required under this subsection (c) shall be made 7after the determination of Illinois net income for the taxable 8year in which the indebtedness is discharged. 9    (d) In the case of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S 10corporation):11        (1) no carryover deduction shall be allowed under this 12    Section for any taxable year ending after December 31, 13    2010 and prior to December 31, 2012; 14        (2) no carryover deduction shall exceed $100,000 for 15    any taxable year ending on or after December 31, 2012 and 16    prior to December 31, 2014 and for any taxable year ending 17    on or after December 31, 2021 and prior to December 31, 18    2024; and19        (3) (blank). no carryover deduction shall exceed 20    $500,000 for any taxable year ending on or after December 21    31, 2024 and prior to December 31, 2027. 22    It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 23limitation on carryover deductions enacted in Article 105 of 24Public Act 103-592 is repealed and inapplicable for all tax 25years ending on or after December 31, 2024. 26    For the purposes of determining the taxable years to which   HB3776- 5 -LRB104 10003 HLH 20073 b1a net loss may be carried under subsection (a) of this Section, 2no taxable year for which a deduction is disallowed under this 3subsection, or for which the deduction would exceed $100,000 4or $500,000, as applicable, if not for this subsection, shall 5be counted. 6    (e) In the case of a residual interest holder in a real 7estate mortgage investment conduit subject to Section 860E of 8the Internal Revenue Code, the net loss in subsection (a) 9shall be equal to: 10        (1) the amount computed under subsection (a), without 11    regard to this subsection (e), or if that amount is 12    positive, zero; 13        (2) minus an amount equal to the amount computed under 14    subsection (a), without regard to this subsection (e), 15    minus the amount that would be computed under subsection 16    (a) if the taxpayer's federal taxable income were computed 17    without regard to Section 860E of the Internal Revenue 18    Code and without regard to this subsection (e). 19    The modification in this subsection (e) is exempt from the 20provisions of Section 250. 21(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-669, eff. 11-16-21; 22103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.